Washington statutes.
RCW 3.38.020

Districting committee—Duties—Districting plan.

The district court districting committee shall meet at the call of the prosecuting attorney to prepare or amend the plan for the districting of the county into one or more district court districts in accordance with the provisions of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW. The plan shall include the following:

(1) The boundaries of each district proposed to be established;

(2) The number of judges to be elected in each district or electoral district, if any. In determining the number of judges to be elected, the districting committee shall consider the results of an objective workload analysis conducted by the administrator for the courts;

(3) The location of the central office, courtrooms and records of each court;

(4) The other places in the district, if any, where the court shall sit;

(5) The number and location of district court commissioners to be authorized, if any;

(6) The departments, if any, into which each district court shall be initially organized, including municipal departments provided for in *chapter 3.46 RCW;

(7) The name of each district; and

(8) The allocation of the time and allocation of salary of each judge who will serve part time in a municipal department.

[ 2003 c 97 s 4; 1984 c 258 s 23; 1965 ex.s. c 110 s 1; 1961 c 299 s 26.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Creation and operation of municipal departments under chapter 3.46 RCW is limited by RCW 3.46.015.

Effective date—2003 c 97: See note following RCW 3.34.010.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.